District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

2-1223.01

Definitions.

Repealed.

History

Dec. 7, 2004, D.C. Law 15-219, § 101, 51 DCR 9142
Mar. 17, 2005, D.C. Law 15-257, § 3(a)(1), 52 DCR 1161
Mar. 2, 2007, D.C. Law 16-191, §§ 13, 14(a), 121(a), 53 DCR 6794
Mar. 26, 2008, D.C. Law 17-138, § 104(a), 55 DCR 1689

Temporary Amendment of Section

D.C. Law 17-53, §§ 103, 104, and 601 repealed provisions as follows:
“Sec. 103. (a) The National Capital Revitalization Corporation Act of 1998, effective September 11, 1998 (D.C. Law 12-144; D.C. Official Code § 2-1219.01 et seq.), is repealed.
“(b) This section shall apply as of October 1, 2007.
“Sec. 104. (a) The Anacostia Waterfront Corporation Act of 2004, effective December 7, 2004 (D.C. Law 15-219; D.C. Official Code § 2-1223.01 et seq.), is repealed.
“(b) This section shall apply as of October 1, 2007.”
“TITLE VI. CONFORMING AMENDMENTS.
“Sec. 601. Subtitle P of Title II of the Fiscal Year 2008 Budget Support Act of 2007, signed by the Mayor on June 28, 2007 (D.C. Act 17-63), is repealed.”
Section 702(b) of D.C. Law 17-53 provides that the act shall expire after 225 days of its having taken effect.

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 101 of Anacostia Waterfront Corporation Emergency Act of 2004 (D.C. Act 15-586, November 1, 2004, 51 DCR 10681).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2(a) of Anacostia Waterfront Corporation Clarification Emergency Act of 2005 (D.C. Act 16-64, April 20, 2005, 52 DCR 4135).

Effective Dates

Section 3(b) of D.C. Law 15-257 provided: “(b) This section shall not apply until the effective date of the Anacostia Waterfront Corporation Act of 2004, signed by the Mayor on August 5, 2004 (D.C. Act 15-527; 51 DCR 9142) [December 7, 2004].”

Editor's Notes

Section 104(b) of Law 17-138 provided that this section shall apply as of October 1, 2007.